Hawaii statutes.
[§341-1] Findings and purpose. The
legislature finds that the quality of the environment is as important to the
welfare of the people of Hawaii as is the economy of the State. The
legislature further finds that the determination of an optimum balance between
economic development and environmental quality deserves the most thoughtful
consideration, and that the maintenance of the optimum quality of the
environment deserves the most intensive care.

The purpose of this chapter is to stimulate,
expand and coordinate efforts to determine and maintain the optimum quality of
the environment of the State. [L 1970, c 132, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next